Washington statutes.
RCW 36.78.121

Maintenance.

The county road administration board, or its successor entity, shall establish a standard of good practice for maintenance of transportation system assets. This standard must be implemented by all counties no later than December 31, 2007. The board shall develop a model maintenance management system for use by counties. The board shall develop rules to assist the counties in the implementation of this system. Counties shall annually submit their maintenance plans to the board. The board shall compile the county data regarding maintenance management and annually submit it to the office of financial management.

[ 2006 c 334 s 10; 2003 c 363 s 307.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 334: See note following RCW 47.01.051.

Finding—Intent—2003 c 363: See note following RCW 35.84.060.

Part headings not law—Severability—2003 c 363: See notes following RCW 47.28.241.